Maryland, session 2025, HB0545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–112.
(a) (1) In this section[, “expunge”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(3) (I) “EXPUNGE” means to:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0545*

HOUSE BILL 545
1. remove all references to a specified criminal case from the
Central Repository; AND
2. REMOVE FROM PUBLIC VIEW ALL ELECTRONIC COURT
RECORDS RELATING TO THE CASE.
(II) EXPUNGEMENT DOES NOT REQUIRE:
1. PHYSICAL OBLITERATION OF RECORDS; OR
2. REDACTION OF PHYSICAL OR ELECTRONIC
DOCUMENTS, MEDIA, OR RECORDINGS.
(b) On or before July 1, [2024] 2027, the Department [of Public Safety and
Correctional Services] AND THE JUDICIARY shall expunge all cases in which ALL
CHARGES IN THE CASE ARE ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT UNDER:
(1) [possession of cannabis under § 5–601 of the Criminal Law Article is
the only charge in the case; and] § 10–105 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF AT LEAST 3 YEARS
HAVE PASSED SINCE THE DISPOSITION OF THE CASE; OR
(2) [the charge was issued before July 1, 2023] § 10–110 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, IF:
(I) THE CHARGE IS A MISDEMEANOR OTHER THAN:
1. A CHARGE MARKED IN ELECTRONIC COURT RECORDS
AS A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME UNDER § 6–233 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
2. ASSAULT IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 3–203 OF
THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) AT LEAST 7 YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE DISPOSITION OF
THE CASE.
(C) (1) BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2027, THE JUDICIARY SHALL, ONCE PER
MONTH, IDENTIFY ALL CASES THAT ARE NEWLY ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT
BASED ON THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) PROMPTLY AFTER MAKING EACH DETERMINATION REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE JUDICIARY SHALL
ELECTRONICALLY NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ALL CASES THAT ARE NEWLY
ELIGIBLE FOR EXPUNGEMENT.

HOUSE BILL 545 3
(3) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE NOTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT AND THE JUDICIARY
SHALL EXPUNGE THE IDENTIFIED NEWLY ELIGIBLE CASES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.